Delaware, session 153, HB101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $17,561,900 (Seventeen Million, Five Hundred Sixty-One Thousand,
Nine Hundred Dollars) in General Funds to Executive, Office of Management and Budget, Contingencies and One-
Time Items (10-02-11) for the following purposes:
(02-08-10) Equipment $34,100
(02-13-10) Permit to Purchase $13,300
(10-07-01) Permit to Purchase $6,700
(10-02-11) ERP Cloud Migration $2,000,000
(10-02-11) Technology $432,200
(10-02-11) Health Care Services Contingency $3,500,000
(10-02-11) Trauma Informed Services Contingency $1,700,000
(10-02-11) Department of Justice Lease $3,000,000
(12-03-02) Insurance Revenue Shortfall $3,000,000
(12-05-06) Delaware EARNS $403,700
(15-02-02) Equipment $23,800
(20-03-01) Delaware Heritage Commission $250,000
(35-01-10) Hospital Provider Contingency $1,500,000
(38-01-03) Prison Research Innovation Network $52,700
OMB:GOV
0211530002 Page 1 of 2

(45-01-20) Equipment $350,000
(45-02-10) Equipment $200,000
(45-06-08) Permit to Purchase $858,400
(60-01-40) Equipment $200,000
(75-02-01) Emergency Training Equipment $37,000
Section 2. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $13,300 in Permit to Purchase to Judicial, Justice of the Peace
Court (02-13-10). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate
Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.
Section 3. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $6,700 in Permit to Purchase to Executive, Criminal Justice,
Criminal Justice Council (10-07-01). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of Senate
Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.
Section 4. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $3,500,000 to Executive, Office of Management and Budget,
Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for health programs funded by the Tobacco Settlement Fund. These
funds shall be used to supplement Fiscal Year 2026 reductions to state-operated health programs, with the intent that
the agencies affected will determine alternative state, federal or private funding sources to sustain the existing
programs in subsequent fiscal years if continued.
Section 5. Section 1 of this act appropriates $3,000,000 to Executive, Office of Management and Budget,
Contingencies and One-Time Items (10-02-11) for first year lease and associated moving expenses for the Department
of Justice. The expenditure of these funds shall be contingent upon the passing of fee legislation amending 6 Del. C. §
73 and Title 6 of Administrative Code.
Section 6. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $23,800 in Equipment to Office of Defense Services, Public
Defender (15-02-02). The expenditure of these funds shall support full implementation of House Bill 86 as passed by
the 152nd General Assembly.
Section 7. Section 1 of this Act appropriates $858,400 in Permit to Purchase to Safety and Homeland Security,
State Police, State Bureau of Identification (45-06-08). The expenditure of these funds shall support full
implementation of Senate Substitute 1 for Senate Bill 2 as passed by the 152nd General Assembly.